Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-236
Optimum carrying capacity, defined.

Optimum carrying capacity means that point at which a given habitat can support healthy populations of wildlife species, having regard to the total ecosystem without diminishing the ability of the habitat to continue that function.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 46.